Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.910

Continuation of rules adopted pursuant to repealed sections.

The repeal of RCW 15.57.010 through 15.57.930 and the enactment of this chapter shall not be deemed to have repealed any rules adopted under the provisions of RCW 15.57.010 through 15.57.930 in effect immediately prior to such repeal and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. All such rules shall be considered to have been adopted under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1989 c 380 s 31; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 43.]